Massachusetts, session 194th, S645.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended by inserting after section 244 the following section:-  
Section 245. Coal Tar Pavement Sealant Products.  
(a) For the purposes of this section, the following words shall have the following 
meanings:  
“Coal tar”, a viscous substance obtained by the destructive distillation of coal and 
containing levels of polycyclic aromatic hydrocarbons in excess of 10,000 milligrams per 
kilogram. "Coal tar" includes, but is not limited to, refined coal tar, high temperature coal tar, 
coal tar pitch and coal tar pitch volatiles.  
“Coal tar sealant product”, a surface-applied sealant product that contains at least a 20 
percent coal tar pitch and is for use on an asphalt or concrete surface, including a driveway or 
parking area, and are a major source of polycyclic aromatic hydrocarbons in the environment.  

of 2 13  (b) No person or entity shall apply, or permit the application on property he or she owns, 
a coal tar sealant product on a driveway or parking area.  
Any person or entity who violates this subsection shall be punished by a fine of not less 
than $500 and, for a second or subsequent violation, by a fine of not less than $1000 or by 
imprisonment in the house of correction for not more than 1 year.   
SECTION 2. Section 1 shall take effect on January 1, 2026.